Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.235

Payment by credit or debit card.

The department may adopt necessary rules and procedures to allow use of credit and debit cards for payment of fees and excise taxes to the department and its agents or subagents related to the licensing of drivers, the issuance of identicards, and vehicle and vessel certificates of title and registration. The department may establish a convenience fee to be paid by the credit or debit card user whenever a credit or debit card is chosen as the payment method. The fee must be sufficient to offset the charges imposed on the department and its agents and subagents by credit and debit card companies. In no event may the use of credit or debit cards authorized by this section create a loss of revenue to the state.

The use of a personal credit card does not rely upon the credit of the state as prohibited by Article VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution.

[ 2010 c 161 s 207; 2004 c 249 s 9; 1999 c 271 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.